Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2690.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 322(c) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 322. Powers and duties of commission.* * *(c) Specific powers and duties.--In order to administrate and enforce this title, the commission through proper action shall:* * *(14) Establish license and permit fees as follows:(i) The commission shall publish a notice of proposed rulemaking containing the proposed license or permit class or fee changes in accordance with section 201 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), 1234567891011121314151617181920 referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law. The commission shall give at least 30 days for the submission of written comments and shall hold at least one public hearing on the proposed change.(ii) Prior to adoption of a final-form regulation containing a license or permit class or fee change, the commission shall review and consider any public comments and may modify the text of the final-form regulation, as necessary, under section 202 of the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) After adoption of a final-form regulation containing a license or permit class or fee change, the commission shall submit the final-form regulation, copies of all public comments and the transcript of the public hearing to the Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate and the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives.(iv) Either committee under subparagraph (iii) may report a concurrent resolution recommending disapproval of the license or permit class or fee change within 30 days of the submission under subparagraph (iii) or within 10 legislative days of the submission, whichever is later. If neither committee reports a concurrent resolution recommending disapproval within the time prescribed in this subparagraph, the license or permit class or fee change shall be deemed approved.(v) If either committee reports a concurrent resolution under subparagraph (iv) and the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution within 30 days of the date on which the concurrent resolution is 20260HB2690PN3640 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reported or within 10 legislative days of the report, whichever is later, the license or permit class or fee change shall be deemed approved.(vi) If the General Assembly adopts a concurrent resolution under subparagraph (iv) within 30 days of the date on which the concurrent resolution is reported or within 10 legislative days, whichever is later, the following shall apply:(A) The concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(B) If the Governor does not veto the concurrent resolution of the General Assembly within 10 days after the concurrent resolution is presented, the license or permit class or fee change shall be deemed disapproved.(C) If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution within 10 days after the resolution is presented, the General Assembly may, within 30 days of the veto or within 10 legislative days of the veto, whichever is later, override the veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. If the General Assembly does not override the veto in the time prescribed in this clause, the license or permit class or fee change shall be deemed approved. If the General Assembly overrides the veto in the time prescribed in this clause, the license or permit class or fee change shall be deemed disapproved.(vii) If the license or permit class or fee change is deemed approved under subparagraph (iv), (v) or (vi)20260HB2690PN3640 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C), the commission shall:(A) submit the final-form regulation containing the license or permit class or fee change to the Office of Attorney General for approval as to legality; and(B) publish an order adopting the final-form regulation containing the license or permit class or fee change and deposit the text of the order with the Legislative Reference Bureau in accordance with section 207 of the Commonwealth Documents Law.Section 2. Section 2705 of Title 34 is amended to read:§ 2705. Classes of licenses.[Unless otherwise provided, any person wishing to exercise any of the privileges granted by this title shall first secure the applicable resident or nonresident hunting or furtaker license as follows:(1) Adult resident hunting licenses to residents who have reached their 17th birthday but have not reached their 65th birthday.(2) Junior resident hunting licenses to residents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, bearing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual hunting privileges granted to the holder of a junior license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(3) Senior resident hunting licenses or, at the option of the applicant, a senior lifetime resident hunting license 20260HB2690PN3640 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to residents who have reached or will reach their 65th birthday in the license year of the application for the license. The commission shall develop, implement and administer a system to provide tags, report cards and applications to those residents who hold a senior lifetime resident hunting license issued under this paragraph. The system shall require the applicant or license holder to pay any approved fee assessed by the issuing agent.(4) Adult resident furtaker licenses to residents who have reached their 17th birthday but have not reached their 65th birthday.(5) Junior resident furtaker licenses to residents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, containing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual furtaking privileges granted to the holder of a junior license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(6) Senior resident furtaker licenses or, at the option of the applicant, a senior lifetime resident furtaker license to residents who have reached or will reach their 65th birthday in the license year of the application for the license.(7) Senior lifetime resident combination hunting and furtaking license, including archery and muzzleloader privileges, to residents who have reached or will reach their 65th birthday in the license year of the application for the license. The commission shall develop, implement and 20260HB2690PN3640 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administer a system to provide tags, report cards and applications to those residents who hold a senior lifetime resident hunting license issued under this paragraph. The system shall require the applicant or license holder to pay any approved fee assessed by the issuing agent.(7.1) Junior resident combination hunting and furtaker license, including archery and muzzleloader privileges, to residents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, containing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual privileges granted to the holder of a junior resident combination license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(8) Adult nonresident hunting licenses to all nonresidents of 17 years of age or older.(9) Junior nonresident hunting licenses to all nonresidents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, bearing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual hunting privileges granted to the holder of a junior license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(10) Adult nonresident furtaker licenses to nonresidents of 17 years of age or older.(11) Junior nonresident furtaker licenses to 20260HB2690PN3640 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonresidents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, containing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual furtaking privileges granted to the holder of a junior license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(11.1) Junior nonresident combination hunting and furtaker license, including archery and muzzleloader privileges, to nonresidents who have reached or will reach their 12th birthday in the license year of application for a license but who have not reached their 17th birthday prior to the date of the application for the license and who present a written request, containing the signature of a parent or guardian, for the issuance of a license. The actual privileges granted to the holder of a junior nonresident combination license shall not be exercised until that person in fact is 12 years of age.(12) Seven-day nonresident small game license to persons eligible to procure a nonresident hunting license. The license shall be valid for a period of seven consecutive days. The holder of the license shall be entitled to hunt for, take or kill crows and small game.(13) Antlerless deer licenses, bear licenses, archery licenses, muzzleloader licenses and any other license required to insure just and proper administration of this title and sound game or wildlife conservation to eligible persons, subject to the regulations, requirements and 20260HB2690PN3640 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions which the commission shall establish. Any such license shall be made available to residents serving on active duty in the armed forces of the United States or in the United States Coast Guard without regard to quota limitations or application deadlines.(14) Migratory game bird licenses for hunting all migratory game birds to eligible persons, subject to the regulations, requirements and conditions which the commission shall establish. Any such license shall be made available to residents serving on active duty in the armed forces of the United States or in the United States Coast Guard without regard to quota limitations or application deadlines.(15) Elk hunting license to persons eligible for classes of licenses in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (7), (7.1), (8), (9) and (11.1). Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title or the regulations promulgated thereunder, elk licenses under this paragraph shall not be subject to the provisions of sections 2706 (relating to resident license and fee exemptions) and 2706.1 (relating to complimentary nonresident licenses). To ensure sound management of Pennsylvania's wild elk population, the commission may promulgate regulations to establish a limited number of licenses. The commission may establish a nonrefundable application fee at a cost of $10.(16) Special wild turkey license to be used in conjunction with an adult or junior resident license, adult or junior nonresident license, senior resident license, senior resident lifetime license, senior lifetime resident combination hunting and furtaking license and junior resident and nonresident combination hunting and furtaking license when the commission by regulation authorizes the harvest of 20260HB2690PN3640 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wild turkeys over and above the number of turkey harvest tags attached to the preceding licenses.](a) General rule.--Unless otherwise provided in this title, a person wishing to exercise any of the privileges granted by this title shall first secure the applicable resident or nonresident hunting or furtaker licenses established by the commission. The commission shall promulgate regulations to create licenses the commission deems necessary to properly manage the game or wildlife resources of this Commonwealth and define the activities which may be performed under authority granted by the issued licenses.(b) Limitations on establishment of licenses.--(1) A new license or change in license class established by the commission under subsection (a) must be made under section 322(c)(14) (relating to powers and duties of commission).(2) The commission shall maintain all license classes existing prior to the effective date of this subsection for a period of three years from the effective date of this subsection by promulgation of regulations in accordance with the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law. This paragraph shall not apply to a new license class first established after the effective date of this subsection.Section 3. Section 2709 heading and (a) of Title 34 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2709. License [costs and] fees.(a) [License costs.--Any person who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued the applicable 20260HB2690PN3640 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license upon payment of the following costs and the issuing agent's fee:(1) (i) Junior resident hunting - $5.(ii) Junior resident combination hunting and furtaker - $8.(2) (i) Adult resident hunting - $19.(ii) Resident military personnel hunting - $1.(iii) Former prisoner of war hunting - $1.(iv) Pennsylvania National Guard hunting - $1.(v) Reserve component of the armed forces hunting - $1.(vi) Volunteer instructor license - $1.(3) (i) Senior resident hunting - $12.(ii) Senior lifetime resident hunting - $50.(iii) Senior lifetime resident combination hunting and furtaker - $100.(4) Bear hunting:(i) Resident - $15.(ii) Nonresident - $35.(5) Antlerless deer:(i) Resident, including resident military, resident disabled veteran and landowner - $5.(ii) Nonresident - $25.(6) Archery deer:(i) Resident - $15.(ii) Nonresident - $25.(7) Muzzleloader deer:(i) Resident - $10.(ii) Nonresident - $20.(8) (Reserved).20260HB2690PN3640 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Adult nonresident hunting - $100.(10) (i) Junior nonresident hunting - $40.(ii) Junior nonresident combination hunting and furtaker - $50.(11) Seven-day nonresident small game - $30.(12) Junior resident furtakers - $5.(13) Adult resident furtakers - $19.(14) (i) Senior resident furtakers - $12.(ii) Senior lifetime resident furtaker - $50.(15) Adult nonresident furtaker - $80.(16) Junior nonresident furtaker - $40.(17) Resident disabled veteran hunting or furtaker under section 2706(b) (relating to disabled veterans) - no cost.(18) Replacement license - $5. Antlerless deer and bear licenses shall be replaced by the original issuing agent only.(19) Owners or possessors of land open to public hunting under section 2706(d) (relating to owners or possessors of land open to public hunting) - $3.(20) Migratory game bird hunting license:(i) Resident - $2.(ii) Nonresident - $5.(21) Elk hunting license:(i) Resident - $25.(ii) Nonresident - $250.(22) Special wild turkey license:(i) Resident - $20.(ii) Nonresident - $40.] License fees.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) or any other provision of this chapter, a person who qualifies under 20260HB2690PN3640 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the provisions of this chapter shall be issued the applicable license upon payment of the applicable fees set by the commission.(2) A person who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued any of the following licenses upon payment of the following costs and the issuing agent's fee:(i) Junior resident hunting - $2.(ii) Junior resident combination hunting and furtaker - $5.(3) The commission shall, as deemed necessary to properly manage the game or wildlife resources of this Commonwealth, promulgate regulations setting applicable fees for a license established under the authority of section 2705 (relating to classes of licenses).(a.1) Limitations on fee setting.--(1) A new fee or change in fee set by the commission under subsection (a) must be made under section 322(c)(14) (relating to powers and duties of commission).(2) The commission shall maintain all license fees for applicable license classes existing under subsection (a) prior to the effective date of this subsection for a period of three years from the effective date of this subsection by promulgation of regulations in accordance with the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law. This paragraph does not apply to fees set for new licenses first established after the effective date of this subsection.* * *Section 4. Section 2712(b) of Title 34 is amended to read:§ 2712. Vouchers for licenses and permits.20260HB2690PN3640 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(b) Fees.--A person purchasing a voucher shall pay the costs for the type of license or permit being purchased and the issuing agent fee as provided in sections 2709 (relating to license [costs and] fees) and 2904 (relating to permit fees).* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2690PN3640 - 13 - 1234567